en: Bulletin Board Accessories
xx: Bulletin Board Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k nástěnkám
da: Tilbehør til opslagstavler
de: Zubehör für Anschlagbretter
es: Accesorios para tablones de anuncios
fr: Accessoires pour panneaux d'affichage
it: Accessori per bacheche informative
ja: 掲示板関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor prikborden
no: Tilbehør til oppslagstavler
pl: Akcesoria do tablic biurowych
pt: Acessórios para quadro de avisos
ru: Принадлежности для досок объявлений
sv: Tillbehör för anslagstavlor
tr: İlan Panosu Aksesuarları

en: Bulletin Board Trim
xx: Bulletin Board Trim
cs: Bordury na nástěnky
da: Pynt til opslagstavle
de: Dekorative Elemente für Anschlagbretter
es: Ribetes para tablones de anuncios
fr: Bordures pour panneaux d'affichage
it: Decorazioni per bacheche informative
ja: 掲示板用飾り
nl: Sierlijsten voor prikborden
no: Dekorbånd til oppslagstavler
pl: Obramowania do tablic biurowych
pt: Moldura para quadro de avisos
ru: Окантовка для досок объявлений
sv: Rampanel för anslagstavla
tr: İlan Panosu Çerçevesi

en: Bulletin Board Trim Sets
xx: Bulletin Board Trim Sets
cs: Sady okrajů na nástěnku
da: Sæt til tilpasning af opslagstavler
de: Rahmensets für Anschlagbretter
es: Juegos de cenefas para tablones de anuncios
fr: Bordures pour tableaux d'affichage
it: Set di decorazioni per bacheche informative
ja: 掲示板トリムセット
nl: Versiersets voor prikborden
no: Pyntelister for oppslagstavler
pl: Ozdobne ramki i narożniki do tablic ogłoszeń
pt: Conjuntos de borda para mural
ru: Наборы лент для оформления стенда
sv: Set med dekoration till anslagstavlor
tr: Mantar Pano Yapıştırma Setleri

en: Bulletin Boards
xx: Bulletin Boards
cs: Nástěnky
da: Opslagstavler
de: Pinnwände
es: Tablones de anuncios
fr: Panneaux d'affichage
it: Bacheche
ja: 掲示板
nl: Prikborden
no: Oppslagstavler
pl: Tablice informacyjne
pt: Quadros de avisos
ru: Доски объявлений
sv: Anslagstavlor
tr: Bildiri Panoları

en: Foam Boards
xx: Foam Boards
cs: Pěnové tabule
da: Skumplader
de: Hartschaumstoffplatten
es: Planchas de espuma
fr: Plaques en mousse
it: Pannelli di gommapiuma
ja: ウレタンボード
nl: Schuimrubberborden
no: Skumtavler
pl: Tablice piankowe
pt: Quadros de espuma
ru: Пенокартон
sv: Skumgummitavlor
tr: Köpük Panolar

en: Mounting Boards
xx: Mounting Boards
cs: Montážní desky
da: Opklæbningsplader
de: Trägerplatten
es: Tableros de montaje
fr: Cartons à cadre
it: Pannelli di montaggio
ja: 台紙
nl: Montageborden
no: Monteringstavler
pl: Tablice montażowe
pt: Quadros para montagem
ru: Монтажные щиты
sv: Monteringstavlor
tr: Montaj Panoları

en: Poster Boards
xx: Poster Boards
cs: Plakátovací plochy
da: Plakattavler
de: Plakatkartons
es: Tableros para pósteres
fr: Tableaux d'affichage
it: Pannelli per poster
ja: ポスターボード
nl: Posterborden
no: Plakattavler
pl: Tablice na plakaty
pt: Quadros para pôster
ru: Плакатные щиты
sv: Affischtavlor
tr: Afiş Panoları

en: Document Cameras
xx: Document Cameras
cs: Snímací kamery
da: Dokumentkameraer
de: Dokumentenkameras
es: Cámara de documentos
fr: Vidéo-visualiseurs numériques
it: Visualizzatori
ja: 書画カメラ
nl: Documentcamera's
no: Dokumentkameraer
pl: Rzutniki
pt: Câmeras para documentos
ru: Документ-камеры
sv: Dokumentkameror
tr: Doküman Kameraları

en: Dry-Erase Boards
xx: Dry-Erase Boards
cs: Bílé tabule
da: Whiteboards
de: Whiteboards
es: Pizarras blancas
fr: Tableaux effaçables à sec, Tableau d'écriture
it: Lavagne bianche
ja: ホワイトボード
nl: Whiteboards
no: Whiteboardtavler
pl: Tablice suchościeralne
pt: Quadros brancos
ru: Маркерные доски
sv: Whiteboards
tr: Beyaz Yazı Tahtası

en: Easel Pads
xx: Easel Pads
cs: Papír na tabuli
da: Flipoverblokke
de: Flipchart-Blöcke
es: Rotafolios
fr: Chevalets de conférence, Chevalet d'écriture
it: Lavagne a fogli mobili
ja: イーゼルパッド
nl: Flipoverstandaarden
no: Staffeliblokker
pl: Flipcharty
pt: Blocos para cavalete
ru: Этюдники
sv: Blädderblock
tr: Şövale Tahtaları

en: Easels
xx: Easels
cs: Tabule s papírem
da: Staffelier
de: Flipcharts
es: Caballetes de oficina
fr: Chevalets de présentation
it: Cavalletti da presentazione
ja: プレゼン用イーゼル
nl: Ezels
no: Staffelier
pl: Sztalugi
pt: Cavaletes
ru: Мольберты
sv: Blädderblocksställ
tr: Şövaleler

en: Laser Pointers
xx: Laser Pointers
cs: Laserová ukazovátka
da: Laserpegepinde
de: Laserpointer
es: Punteros láser
fr: Pointeurs laser
it: Puntatori laser
ja: レーザーポインター
nl: Laserpointers
no: Laserpekere
pl: Wskaźniki laserowe
pt: Indicadores a laser
ru: Лазерные указки
sv: Laserpekare
tr: Lazer Anahtarlıklar

en: Lecterns
xx: Lecterns
cs: Pultíky
da: Læsepulte
de: Lesepulte
es: Atriles
fr: Lutrins
it: Supporti per lettura
ja: 講演台
nl: Lessenaars
no: Talerstoler
pl: Pulpity
pt: Apoio para livros e discursos
ru: Кафедры
sv: Talarstolar
tr: Kürsüler

en: Transparencies
xx: Transparencies
cs: Fólie
da: Transparenter
de: Folien
es: Transparencias
fr: Transparents
it: Lucidi
ja: OHPフィルム
nl: Transparanten
no: Transparenter
pl: Foliogramy
pt: Transparências
ru: Прозрачные листы
sv: OH-apparater
tr: Tepegöz Saydamları

en: Wireless Presenters
xx: Wireless Presenters
cs: Nástroje pro bezdrátové prezentace
da: Trådløse præsentationsprodukter
de: Präsentationsfernbedienungen
es: Presentadores inalámbrico
fr: Télécommandes de présentation
it: Presentatori wireless
ja: プレゼン用リモコン
nl: Draadloze aanwijzers
no: Trådløse presentasjonsapparater
pl: Bezprzewodowe akcesoria do prezentacji
pt: Apresentadores sem fio
ru: Беспроводные устройства для презентаций
sv: Trådlös presentationsutrustning
tr: Kablosuz Sunum Kumandaları

en: Shipping Supplies
xx: Shipping Supplies
cs: Balicí potřeby
da: Forsendelsesmaterialer
de: Versandbedarf
es: Accesorios para envíos
fr: Fournitures d'expédition
it: Forniture per spedizioni
ja: 梱包用品
nl: Verzendbenodigdheden
no: Fraktutstyr
pl: Akcesoria pakunkowe
pt: Suprimentos para remessas
ru: Упаковочные материалы
sv: Leveransmaterial
tr: Nakliye Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Moving & Shipping Boxes
xx: Moving & Shipping Boxes
cs: Krabice na stěhování a zásilky
da: Forsendelseskasser og flyttekasser
de: Umzugs- & Versandkartons
es: Cajas de mudanza y envío
fr: Emballages de déménagement et d'expédition
it: Scatole per spedizioni e traslochi
ja: 梱包用段ボール箱
nl: Verzend- en verhuisdozen
no: Flytteesker og forsendelsesesker
pl: Pudełka wysyłkowe
pt: Caixas de remessa e para mudança
ru: Упаковочные и посылочные коробки
sv: Flyttlådor och fraktlådor
tr: Taşıma ve Nakliyat Kutuları

en: Packing Materials
xx: Packing Materials
cs: Obalové materiály
da: Pakkemateriale
de: Verpackungsmaterialien
es: Materiales de embalaje
fr: Matériaux d'emballage
it: Materiali per imballaggi
ja: 梱包資材
nl: Verpakkingsmaterialen
no: Pakkemateriale
pl: Materiały pakunkowe
pt: Material de embalagem
ru: Расходные материалы для упаковки
sv: Förpackningsmaterial
tr: Ambalaj Malzemeleri

en: Packing Tape
xx: Packing Tape
cs: Balicí páska
da: Pakketape
de: Packband
es: Cinta de embalaje
fr: Ruban d'emballage
it: Nastro per imballaggi
ja: 梱包テープ
nl: Verpakkingstape
no: Pakketeip
pl: Taśmy pakunkowe
pt: Fita de embalagem
ru: Упаковочная лента
sv: Packtejp
tr: Koli Bantları

en: Sporting Goods, Sport equipment
xx: Sporting Goods
cs: Sportovní potřeby
da: Sportsartikler
de: Sportartikel, Sportausrüstung
es: Equipamiento deportivo, Equipo deportivo
fr: Équipements sportifs, Équipement de sport
it: Articoli sportivi
ja: スポーツ用品
nl: Sportartikelen
no: Sportsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt sportowy
pt: Artigos esportivos
ru: Спортивные товары
sv: Sportartiklar
tr: Spor Malzemeleri